Utah statutes.
11-34-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Bonds" means any evidence or contract of indebtedness that is issued or authorized by a public body, including, without limitation, bonds, refunding bonds, advance refunding bonds, bond anticipation notes, tax anticipation notes, notes, certificates of indebtedness, warrants, commercial paper, contracts, and leases, whether they are general obligations of the issuing public body or are payable solely from a specified source, including annual appropriations by the public body.

(2)  "Public body" means the state and any public department, public agency, or other public entity existing under the laws of the state, including, without limitation, any agency, authority, instrumentality, or institution of the state, and any county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, state university or college, school district, special service district, local district, separate legal or administrative entity created under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or other joint agreement entity, community development and renewal agency, and any other political subdivision, public authority, public agency, or public trust existing under the laws of this state.

